Utah statutes.
17-53-209.   Records to be kept.

The legislative body of each county shall cause to be kept:

(1)  a minute record, in which shall be recorded all orders and decisions made by the county legislative body and the daily proceedings had at all regular and special meetings;

(2)  an allowance record, in which shall be recorded all orders for the allowance of money from the county treasury, to whom made and on what account, dating, numbering, and indexing the same through each year;

(3)  a road record, containing all proceedings and adjudications relating to the establishment, maintenance, charge, and discontinuance of roads and road districts, and all contracts and other matters pertaining thereto;

(4)  a franchise record, containing all franchises granted by the board, for what purpose, the length of time, and to whom granted, the amount of bond and license tax required or other consideration to be paid;

(5)  an ordinance record, in which shall be entered all ordinances or laws duly passed by the county legislative body; and

(6)  a warrant record, to be kept by the county auditor, in which shall be entered in the order of drawing all warrants drawn on the treasurer, with their number and reference to the order on the minute record, with date, amount, on what account, and the name of the payee.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

